DI-30
DIAGNOSTICS - AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A343F)

DI3RU-01

DTC P07 10/38[Transmission Fluid Temperature Sensor
Malfunction (ATF Temperature Sensor)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The ATF temperature sensor converts fluid temperature into a resistance value which is input into the Engine
and ECT ECU.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
Either (a) or (b) is detected for 0.5 sec. or more.
(2-tripdetectionlogic) ¢ Openorshortin ATF temperature sensor
P0710/38 (a) Temperature sensorresistanceislessthan 79 Q * ATFtemperature sensor
(b) Afterthe engine has been operating for 15 minutes or ¢ Engineand ECT ECU
more, the resistance atthe temp. sensoris more than 156 k 2

WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check ATF temperature sensor.

PREPARATION:
(@) Remove the ATF temperature sensor connector.
(b) Remove the ATF temperature sensor
(See page AT-8).
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals of ATF temperature
sensor at 20 °C (68 °F) and 120 °C (248 °F).
OK:
Q07002 Resistance (Approx.):
20°C (68 °F): 12.1 kQ
120 °C (248 °F): 616 Q

NG> Replace the ATF temperature sensor.

@

2 | Check harness and connector between ATF temperature sensor and Engine and
ECT ECU (See page IN-35).

@

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace the harness or connector.
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